Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Nonprofit Legal Services

27A.600.
Designation of nonprofit legal services agencies — Funding — Promotion of pro bono legal assistance.

For each judicial district, the Chief Justice of the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall designate a nonprofit agency to operate and administer programs for the provision of legal services to indigent clients involved in civil matters within the judicial district.

This agency shall be the nonprofit legal services organization designated as eligible to receive funds from the federal Legal Services Corporation for the provision of civil legal services to the indigent, if one exists. The nonprofit legal services organization shall receive supplemental funds provided by this section for each county in the district in which it provides service.

At least twelve and one-half percent (12.5%) of any funds appropriated pursuant to subsection (1)(a) shall be used to promote increased participation by the private bar in the delivery of legal services to the indigent through pro bono efforts, which may include the operation of intake and referral systems; the provision of professional education regarding legal matters peculiar to the indigent; the provision of technical co-counselling assistance to private attorneys engaged in representing indigent clients in civil matters; and reimbursement of reasonable costs and expenses incurred by private attorneys in delivering pro bono legal assistance. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as limiting the maximum amount of funds appropriated under this section which may be used for promotion of pro bono efforts by the private bar, where the local legal services organization’s board of directors deems that an effective and efficient system of delivering legal assistance to the local indigent population would require the allocation of a sum in excess of twelve and one-half percent (12.5%) of the funds disbursed pursuant to this section. The local organization’s board of directors shall annually review the appropriate allocation of funds from this section for the promotion of pro bono services by the private bar.

If any county in the Commonwealth is not currently served by a nonprofit agency eligible to receive funds from the federal Legal Services Corporation, the Chief Justice shall designate a nonprofit agency to provide legal services to indigent clients in civil matters within that county.

In designating an agency pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the Chief Justice shall consult with the Chief Circuit Judge of the judicial district, the president of the local bar association within the county or the judicial district, and agencies providing legal services to indigent clients in civil matters within the judicial district. The designated agency may serve one (1) or more counties within the judicial district, and designation of a multicounty agency shall be undertaken if consultations indicate that it would promote efficient use of funds. To receive designation, an agency shall certify to the Chief Justice that:

It is incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

It is an organization within the meaning of Section 501 (c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; and

All persons participating in delivery of legal services to agency clients provide the service without any fee to the client for these services.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 338, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

27A.610.
Duties of designated agencies.

The agency designated pursuant to KRS

27A.600

shall have the following duties in carrying out the provisions of KRS

27A.600

to

27A.640

:

To develop, operate, and administer programs within the judicial district or districts served to provide free legal services to indigent clients involved in civil matters within the jurisdiction of the courts or the judicial district or districts.

To report annually to the Supreme Court of Kentucky, through the Administrative Office of the Courts, on its activities conducted pursuant to KRS

27A.600

to

27A.640

.

To maintain an appropriate accounting of all funds received pursuant to KRS

27A.600

to

27A.640

, and to prepare and submit to the Administrative Office of the Courts an annual statement accounting for the use of the funds.

To refund annually all unused or uncommitted funds as provided in KRS 27A.630(4).

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 338, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

27A.620.
Forwarding of designations of agencies to circuit clerks.

All designations made by the Chief Justice pursuant to KRS

27A.600

to

27A.640

shall be forwarded to each circuit clerk for the judicial district or districts which shall be served by the agency designated.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 338, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.

27A.630.
Access to Justice Fee — Deposit in State Treasury — Distribution of fees collected — Funding of legal services for children.

Upon receipt of notice of designation of an agency by the circuit clerk, there shall be added to the filing fee in all civil actions filed in Circuit Court the sum of twenty dollars ($20), and to all civil actions filed in District Court, the sum of ten dollars ($10). No fee shall be charged for actions filed in neglect and dependency cases. This fee shall be designated as the Access to Justice Fee, and shall be charged at the time of filing of the first papers in the action.

All fees collected pursuant to subsection (1) of this section during each month shall be placed in the general fund of the State Treasury, and appropriated in accordance with subsection (3) of this section. The clerks shall make a full report with the payment and receive a receipt for all payments.

Fees collected shall be distributed monthly to the designated agencies on a pro rata basis, utilizing an allocation formula that distributes funds for each judicial district served, according to the proportion of the number of residents of that judicial district whose incomes are less than the official United States federal poverty guidelines, based on latest published United States census data, as a percentage of the total number of these residents in the Commonwealth of Kentucky. These funds shall be used by the designated agency to carry out the duties prescribed in KRS

27A.610

.

All unused or uncommitted funds received by a designated agency during its fiscal year shall be returned by the designated agency to the State Treasury, to be redistributed in the following calendar quarter to operating designated agencies in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated by the Administrative Office of the Courts.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) to (4) of this section, an amount not to exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) from the fee imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be appropriated to organizations that specialize in providing legal representation and services to children.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 338, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 2003, ch. 120, § 1, effective June 24, 2003.

27A.640.
Disposition of legal fees awarded for nonprofit or pro bono legal services.

Any fees awarded as a result of legal services provided pursuant to provisions of KRS

27A.600

to

27A.640

shall be payable to the designated agency through which the services were provided and shall be subject to the provisions of KRS 27A.630(4). If fees are recovered by an attorney providing volunteer or pro bono legal services, the attorney may receive reimbursement from the designated agency for transcription and photocopy costs, long distance phone expenses, reasonable travel costs, and similar direct, out-of-pocket expenses.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 338, § 5, effective July 15, 1994.